Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1494.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma State
Department of Education from any monies not otherwise appropriated
from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the sum of One Hundred Fifty Thousand
Dollars ($150,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary for the
purpose of entering into a contract with a 501(c)(3) nonprofit
organization headquartered in Oklahoma, that specializes in
geography instruction and training of educators, to increase
geographic literacy in Oklahoma schools.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

Req. No. 10336 Page 1

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-10336 MJ 11/26/24




















Req. No. 10336 Page 2